Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2725YC (1) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 452A.53, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. Each vehicle operated into or through Iowa in interstate 3 operations using motor fuel, special fuel, or electric fuel 4 acquired in any other state shall carry in or on the vehicle a 5 duplicate or evidence of the permit or license required in this 6 section . A fee not to exceed fifty cents shall be charged The 7 state department of transportation shall adopt rules pursuant 8 to chapter 17A to set the fee for each duplicate or other 9 evidence of a permit or license issued. 10